Missouri, session 2026, SB1672.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 334, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 334.011, to read as
follows:
334.011. 1. The "practice of medicine" shall mean the
examination, evaluation, diagnosis, treatment, operation,
prescription, recommendation, prevention, cure, dispensing,
or surgery for any human injury, disease, pain, deformity,
defect, wound, fracture, infirmity, ailment, or physical or
mental condition, real or imaginary, including the
management of pregnancy and parturition or cosmetic surgery,
whether for compensation or not, and shall also include:
(1) Evaluating a patient or rendering an oral,
written, or otherwise documented medical opinion, or when
providing testimony or records for the purpose of any civil
or criminal action before any judicial or administrative
proceeding of this state or other forum in this state;
(2) The review, oversight, and rendering of decisions
on the health care to be provided or not to be provided by a
treating physician based upon the treating physician's
examination, evaluation, diagnosis, treatment, operation,

SB 1672 2
prescription, recommendation, prevention, or surgery except
as may be otherwise authorized pursuant to state law;
(3) In the case of a physician who acts as a
consulting physician or specialist in an area of medicine
and who receives a referral from another physician, the
practice of medicine shall specifically include the initial
examination, evaluation, diagnosis, and determination of
appropriate treatment or surgery by the consulting physician
or specialist, and the consulting physician or specialist
may not properly delegate this responsibility to any person
other than to another consulting physician or specialist;
(4) Offering to examine, evaluate, diagnose, treat,
operate, prescribe, recommend, prevent, dispense, or perform
surgery for any human injury, disease, pain, deformity,
ailment, or physical or mental condition;
(5) Using the designation "doctor" or "doctor of
medicine" or "doctor of osteopathy" or "physician and
surgeon" or "Dr.", "M.D.", "D.O.", or any combination
indicating or implying that such person is licensed, or
willing or able, to practice the healing arts; or
(6) Offering, conducting, enrolling, performing, or
monitoring research involving human subjects unless approved
by an institutional review board.
2. Nothing contained in this section shall prohibit a
licensed professional from performing some or all of the
activities that may fall within the practice of medicine,
but only so long as the licensed professional is acting
within and not beyond the scope of his or her statutory
authority and only so long as the physician remains actively
involved in the practice of medicine for each patient and
remains the primary and responsible party for the
examination, evaluation, diagnosis, and determination of

SB 1672 3
appropriate treatment or surgery, and a physician may not
properly delegate this primary responsibility to any other
person.
✓